Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.185

Objectives of boundary review board—Water-sewer district annexations, mergers—Territory not adjacent to district.

The proposal by a water-sewer district to annex territory that is not adjacent to the district shall not be deemed to be violative of the objectives of a boundary review board solely due to the fact that the territory is not adjacent to the water-sewer district. The proposed consolidation or merger of two or more water-sewer districts that are not adjacent to each other shall not be deemed to be violative of the objectives of a boundary review board solely due to the fact that the districts are not adjacent.

[ 1999 c 153 s 47; 1989 c 308 s 13.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.